Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Life Sentence Without Parole

§ 6-10-301.
Life imprisonment without parole; life imprisonment.

Pursuant to article 3, section 53 of the Wyoming constitution, a sentence of life imprisonment without parole is created for specified crimes designated in the Wyoming Criminal Code.

A person sentenced to life imprisonment without parole shall not be eligible for parole and shall remain imprisoned under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections during the remainder of his life unless pardoned by the governor.

Any sentence other than a sentence specifically designated as a sentence of life imprisonment without parole is subject to commutation by the governor. A person sentenced to life imprisonment for an offense committed after the person reached the age of eighteen (18) years is not eligible for parole unless the governor has commuted the person’s sentence to a term of years. A person sentenced to life imprisonment for an offense committed before the person reached the age of eighteen (18) years shall be eligible for parole after commutation of his sentence to a term of years or after having served twenty-five (25) years of incarceration, except that if the person committed any of the acts specified in W.S. 7-13-402(b) after having reached the age of eighteen (18) years the person shall not be eligible for parole.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 73, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207; 2013 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “of 1982” at the end.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (c).

Sentence not de facto life sentence. —

Defendant’s sentence 12 to 50 years for aggravated robbery was not an unconstitutional de facto life sentence because the age on the date of his earliest possible release was 60, which was younger than the 61-years threshold adopted by the Wyoming Supreme Court. Davis v. State, 2020 WY 122, 472 P.3d 1030,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2020).

Individualized sentencing hearing.—

Defendant’s 1992 sentence, which was imposed when defendant was a juvenile, was not a de facto life sentence entitling him to an individualized sentencing hearing under Miller v. Alabama. Defendant’s sentence would render him eligible for parole after serving a minimum of 43 years, at which point he would be 58-years old. Wiley v. State, 2020 WY 49, 461 P.3d 413,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2020).

Life sentence. —

District court
correctly applied the law and did not abuse its discretion in denying
an inmate's motion for relief because it properly disposed of the
inmate's civil rights suit; the district court concluded that the
inmate's life sentence did not fall within the exemption for inmates
under a death sentence or a sentence of “life without the possibility
of parole” because it was not designated as a sentence of life
without parole, which was the type of life sentence addressed in the
exemption Nicodemus v. Lampert, 2014 WY 135, 336 P.3d 671,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2014).

Although the aggregate sentences imposed on defendant for crimes committed as a juvenile did not deprive the parole board of its statutory authority to consider parole of a juvenile after 25 years, the sentence exceeded the limits imposed by Miller v. Alabama and Bear Cloud v. State. Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 1988, 201 L. Ed. 2d 248, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 3049 (U.S. 2018).

Aggregate sentence not de facto life sentence.—

Defendant's
aggregate sentence, which would require defendant to serve at least
35 years before he became parole eligible, was not a de facto life
sentence and did not violate the Eighth Amendment because defendant
would be eligible for parole when he was approximately 50 years old;
defendant failed to establish that the sentence did not provide him
a meaningful opportunity for release. Sen v. State, 2017 WY 30, 390 P.3d 769,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 225, 199 L. Ed. 2d 146, 2017 U.S. LEXIS 4668 (U.S. 2017).

Instructions about the availability of clemency or parole. —

With respect to the future dangerousness considerations of sentencing, it is not unconstitutional for a court to tell the jury about the possibility of executive clemency or parole, but the jury should be clearly informed about a defendant's statutory ineligibility for parole. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

Quoted

in

Booth v. State, 2008 WY 3, 174 P.3d 171,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Jan. 10, 2008); Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014); Nicodemus v. State, 2017 WY 34, 392 P.3d 408,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Revocation of order commuting state criminal sentence, 88 ALR5th 463.